test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VII_VV_IND_mchaa_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VII - VV - mchaa :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	obv     mod     per
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 256)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mchaa+VII+0: mchaa
     mchaa+VII+0+4: mchaani

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     mchaa+VII+0+Prt: mchaaba
     mchaa+VII+0+4+Prt: mchaanwiba #cons
     #mchaa+VII+0+4+Prt: mchaanba #book (w-del, very impoverished UR)
     mchaa+VII+0+Dub: mchaadig
     mchaa+VII+0+4+Dub: mchaanwidig 
     mchaa+VII+0+Prt+Dub: mchaagba
     mchaa+VII+0+4+Prt+Dub: mchaangoba 

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     mchaa+VII+0+Prt+0+Pl: mchaabniin
     mchaa+VII+0+4+Prt+0+Pl: mchaanwibniin #cons
     #mchaa+VII+0+4+Prt+0+Pl: mchaanwabniin #book (unexplained quality shift)
     #mchaa+VII+0+4+Prt+0+Pl: mchaanbniin #book (overdeletion in book, very impoverished UR)
     mchaa+VII+0+Dub+0+Pl: mchaadgenan
     mchaa+VII+0+4+Dub+0+Pl: mchaanwidgenan 
     mchaa+VII+0+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mchaagbaniin
     mchaa+VII+0+4+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mchaangobniin 

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mchaa+VII+0+0+Pl: mchaawan
     #mchaa+VII+0+0+Pl: mchaanoon #book variant (odd hiatus resolution)
     mchaa+VII+0+4+0+Pl: mchaanwan

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0: mchaasnoo #d deletes in negative!
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+4: mchaasnooni 

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+Prt: mchaasnooba
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt: mchaasnoonwiba
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+Dub: mchaasnoodig
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+4+Dub: mchaasnoonwidig
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+Prt+Dub: mchaasnoogba 
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub: mchaasnoongoba 

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+Prt+0+Pl: mchaasnoobniin
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+0+Pl: mchaasnoonwibniin
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+Dub+0+Pl: mchaasnoodgenan
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+4+Dub+0+Pl: mchaasnoonwidgenan
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mchaasnoogbaniin 
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mchaasnoongobniin 

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+0+Pl: mchaasnoon
     mchaa+VII+Neg+0+4+0+Pl: mchaasninwan #no variation listed in book
